California, session 20252026, SB1253.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 115843.7 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:115843.7. (a) In the Salinas Reservoir, recreational uses shall not include recreation in which a participant has bodily contact with the water, unless both all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The water subsequently receives complete water treatment, in compliance with all applicable board regulations, including oxidation, filtration, and disinfection, before being used for domestic purposes. The treatment shall, at a minimum, comply with all state laws and board regulations and all federal laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, the United States Environmental Protection Agency Long Term 2 Enhanced Surface Water Treatment Rule. This section does not limit the state or the board from imposing more stringent treatment standards than those required by federal law.(2) The San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District conducts a monitoring program for cryptosporidium, giardia, and total coliform bacteria, including E. coli and fecal coliform, at a location and frequency determined by the board, and provides the monitoring results to water suppliers directly receiving the water via infrastructure, as determined by the board, within 30 days of receiving the results.(2)(3) The reservoir is operated in compliance with regulations of the board.(b) The recreational use shall be subject to additional conditions and restrictions adopted by the entity operating the water supply reservoir, or required by the board, that are required to further protect or enhance the public health and safety and do not conflict with regulations of the board.(c) Two years after approval of the changed use of the reservoir to a body contact reservoir by the board’s Division of Drinking Water, and biennially thereafter, the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall file, with the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and the board, a report on the recreational uses at the Salinas Reservoir and the water treatment program for that reservoir. That report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(1) The estimated levels and types of recreational uses at the reservoir on a monthly basis.(2) A summary of monitoring in the Salinas Reservoir watershed for cryptosporidium, giardia, and total coliform bacteria, including E. coli and fecal coliform.(3) The most current sanitary survey of the watershed and water quality monitoring.(4) As deemed necessary by the board, an evaluation of recommendations relating to inactivation and removal of cryptosporidium and giardia.(5) Annual reports provided to the board as required by the water permit issued by the board.(6) An evaluation of the impact of source water quality due to recreational activities on the Salinas Reservoir, including any microbiological monitoring.(7) A summary of activities for operation of recreational uses and facilities in a manner that optimizes the water quality.(8) The reservoir management plan and the operations plan.(9) The annual water reports submitted to the consumers each year.(d) For purposes of this section, “board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances in the Salinas Reservoir. The facts constituting the special circumstances are:Recreational activities, including boating, fishing, hiking, biking, and other activities, take place in the several thousand acres of open space surrounding the Salinas Reservoir. The County of San Luis Obispo manages the reservoir and its untreated water. The City of San Luis Obispo will continue effective water treatment through microfiltration and disinfection.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.